Utah statutes.
78B-6-1221.   Lienholders required to exhaust other security first.

Any party to the action, who holds a lien upon the property or any portion of it and has other securities for the payment of the amount of the lien may be required by the court to exhaust the other securities before a distribution of the proceeds of sale.  The court may also order a just reduction to be made from the amount of the lien on the property in the amount of the securities.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

